Utah statutes.
73-1-11.   Appurtenant water rights pass to grantee of land -- Exceptions --
Conveyance of a portion of irrigated land -- Appurtenant water rights --
Evidence -- Where appurtenant -- Partial conveyances of water and land.
(1)  A water right appurtenant to land shall pass to the grantee of the land
unless the grantor:
(a)  specifically reserves the water right or any part of the water right in
the land conveyance document;
(b)  conveys a part of the water right in the land conveyance document; or
(c)  conveys the water right in a separate conveyance document prior to or
contemporaneously with the execution of the land conveyance document.
(2) (a)  If the water right has been exercised in irrigating different parcels
of land at different times, it shall pass to the grantee of a parcel of land
on which the water right was exercised next preceding the time the land
conveyance was executed.
(b)  Subsection (2)(a) applies only to land conveyances executed before May 4,
1998.
(3)  In any conveyance, the grantee assumes the obligation for any unpaid
assessment.
(4)  The right to the use of water evidenced by shares of stock in a
corporation shall not be deemed appurtenant to land.
(5) (a)  This Subsection (5) governs land conveyances executed on or after May
4, 1998, and has no retrospective operation.
(b)  For purposes of land conveyances only, a water right evidenced by any of
the following documents is appurtenant to land:
(i)  a decree entered by a court;
(ii)  a certificate issued under Section 73-3-17;
(iii)  a diligence claim for surface or underground water filed pursuant to
Section 73-5-13;
(iv)  a water user's claim executed for general determination of water rights
proceedings conducted pursuant to Title 73, Chapter 4, Determination of Water
Rights, or pursuant to Section 73-3-16;
(v)  an approval for an application to appropriate water issued under Section
73-3-10;
(vi)  an approval for an application to permanently change the place of use of
water issued under Section 73-3-10; or
(vii)  an approval for an application to exchange water issued under Section
73-3-20.
(c)  For purposes of land conveyances only, the land to which a water right is
appurtenant is the authorized place of use of water as described in the:
(i)  decree;
(ii)  certificate;
(iii)  diligence claim;
(iv)  water user's claim;
(v)  approved application to appropriate water;
(vi)  approved application to permanently change the place of use of water; or
(vii)  approved exchange application.
(d)  If a grantor conveys part of the water right in a land conveyance
document pursuant to Subsection (1)(b), the portion of the water right not
conveyed is presumed to be reserved by the grantor.
(e)  If the land conveyed constitutes only a portion of the authorized place
of use for the water right, the amount of the appurtenant water right that
passes to the grantee shall be proportionate to the conveyed portion of the
authorized place of use.
